Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-1213
Communications service, defined.

Communications service means a cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522, as such section existed on January 1, 2019, an information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, as such section existed on January 1, 2019, a telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, as such section existed on January 1, 2019, or a wireless service.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 13.